District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

50-1301.61

Surety bond — Lien against scheduled real estate.

Repealed.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 136, ch. 222, § 61
Sept. 18, 1982, D.C. Law 4-155,§ 14(e), 29 DCR 3491
1981 Ed., § 40-461.
1973 Ed., § 40-477.